Oklahoma, session 2026, SB700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 27-107 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Acclimatization period” means a specific period of time to


allow for students’ bodies to adapt and work towards the elimination


of exertional heat-related illnesses and deaths within secondary


schools;



Req. No. 1203 Page 1


2. “Exertional heat-related illness” means a serious medical


condition that results from the body’s inability to cool itself in


extremely hot environments. Exertional heat-related illnesses


include exertional heatstroke, heat exhaustion, heat cramps, heat


syncope, heat rash, and muscle breakdown;


3. “Athletic trainer” shall have the same meaning as provided


for in Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. “Practice” means the act of school personnel directly or


indirectly giving individual or team instruction concerning


fundamentals, conditioning activities, and workouts;


5. “School district” means a school district or public charter


school that offers interscholastic secondary school athletics and


activities;


6. “Student” means a secondary-school-age individual who is


participating in an activity or sport which is individual- or team-


based, outside of school or within school, and competitive or in an


organized practice; and


7. “Wet Bulb Globe Temperature” (WBGT) means a measure of how


much heat stress a person is experiencing in direct sunlight, which


takes into account atmospheric factors including temperature,


humidity, wind speed, sun angle, and cloud cover.


B. The State Department of Education and the State Department


of Health shall jointly develop and post on their publicly


accessible websites guidelines, policies, procedures, and safety

Req. No. 1203 Page 2


standards for the prevention and management of exertional heat-


related illness in students’ interscholastic athletics and


activities. The guidelines developed pursuant to this section shall


include, but not be limited to:


1. Identification of environmental conditions at which a public


school district that offers athletics or activities shall limit or


prohibit practice and play using the acclimatization period for all


athletics and activities with a specific set of guidelines dedicated


to football. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to,


teams having eighteen (18) days to complete fourteen practices. The


eighteen days start prior to the team’s first scrimmage, not


including intrasquad scrimmages; and


2. Information regarding the accurate measurement of


environmental heat stress at the site of the athletics or activities


including the use of Web Bulb Globe Temperature (WBGT). WBGT


readings shall be taken on the practice site of athletics or


activities a minimum of every hour, beginning thirty minutes prior


to the beginning of practice. All readings shall be recorded. If a


modification or cancellation to athletics or activities is required,


documentation using the WBGT Heat Participation Policy Record Chart


shall be completed.


C. The governing body of each school district shall develop a


venue-specific exertional heat-related illness emergency action


plan. Each school district shall include guidelines formulated by

Req. No. 1203 Page 3


the WBGT index to assess environmental conditions and heat stress


prevention for students participating in athletics and activities,


criteria for the establishment of cooling zones, hydration


guidelines, modifications for competitions and scrimmages, and


evidence-based practices to treat exertional heat-related illnesses


associated with athletics and activities.


D. School districts that offer athletics and activities may


hold an informational meeting prior to the start of each athletic


season for all ages of competitors and their parents and legal


guardians regarding the warning signs, symptoms, and treatment of


exertional heat-related illness.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1203 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:38 AM













Req. No. 1203 Page 4